ces-rus_present/apertium/apertium-ces/apertium-ces.ces.dix
    <!-- FIXME: there's also a mi version, with a slightly different declension -->     
    <pardef n="ilumináto/r__n">
      <e><p><l>r</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ři</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rové</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rů</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rovi</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rům</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ry</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>re</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ři</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rové</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rovi</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rech</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rem</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ry</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="hospodářství__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>m</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ch</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>m</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="bar/va__n">
      <e><p><l>va</l><r>va<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vy</l><r>va<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vy</l><r>va<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ev</l><r>va<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vě</l><r>va<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vám</l><r>va<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vu</l><r>va<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vy</l><r>va<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vo</l><r>va<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vy</l><r>va<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vě</l><r>va<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vách</l><r>va<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vou</l><r>va<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vami</l><r>va<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="zbra/ň__n">
      <e><p><l>ň</l><r>ň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ně</l><r>ň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ně</l><r>ň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ní</l><r>ň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ni</l><r>ň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ním</l><r>ň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ň</l><r>ň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ně</l><r>ň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ni</l><r>ň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ně</l><r>ň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ni</l><r>ň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ních</l><r>ň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ní</l><r>ň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>němi</l><r>ň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="mrd/na__n">
      <e><p><l>na</l><r>na<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ny</l><r>na<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ny</l><r>na<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>en</l><r>na<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ně</l><r>na<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nám</l><r>na<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nu</l><r>na<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ny</l><r>na<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>no</l><r>na<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ny</l><r>na<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ně</l><r>na<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nách</l><r>na<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nou</l><r>na<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nami</l><r>na<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="BASE__byt">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>y</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ů</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ům</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>y</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>y</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>u</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ě</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ech</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>em</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>y</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="byt__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/></r></p><par n="BASE__byt"/></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="Bejrút__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/></r></p><par n="BASE__byt"/></e>
    </pardef>
     

    <e lm="barva"><i>bar</i><par n="bar/va__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blahobyt"><i>blahobyt</i><par n="byt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="citát"><i>citát</i><par n="byt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hrad"><i>hrad</i><par n="byt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hřivna"><i>hřiv</i><par n="mrd/na__n"/></e>
    <e lm="iluminátor"><i>ilumináto</i><par n="ilumináto/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kombinát"><i>kombinát</i><par n="byt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="konírna"><i>konír</i><par n="mrd/na__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kurva"><i>kur</i><par n="bar/va__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lesnictví"><i>lesnictví</i><par n="hospodářství__n"/></e>
    <e lm="majestát"><i>majestát</i><par n="byt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="odjezd"><i>odjezd</i><par n="byt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="panna"><i>pan</i><par n="mrd/na__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pochva"><i>poch</i><par n="bar/va__n"/></e>
    <e lm="podkroví"><i>podkroví</i><par n="hospodářství__n"/></e>
    <e lm="postulát"><i>postulát</i><par n="byt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pryčna"><i>pryč</i><par n="mrd/na__n"/></e>
    <e lm="příklad"><i>příklad</i><par n="byt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rozmezí"><i>rozmezí</i><par n="hospodářství__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tiskárna"><i>tiskár</i><par n="mrd/na__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vulva"><i>vul</i><par n="bar/va__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zbraň"><i>zbra</i><par n="zbra/ň__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zákoutí"><i>zákoutí</i><par n="hospodářství__n"/></e>
    <e lm="západ"><i>západ</i><par n="byt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="úschovna"><i>úschov</i><par n="mrd/na__n"/></e>
    <e lm="celibát"><i>celibát</i><par n="byt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="granát"><i>granát</i><par n="byt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kompost"><i>kompost</i><par n="byt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="manifest"><i>manifest</i><par n="byt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pařát"><i>pařát</i><par n="byt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="příjezd"><i>příjezd</i><par n="byt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sekretariát"><i>sekretariát</i><par n="byt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ústav"><i>ústav</i><par n="byt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Bagdád"><i>Bagdád</i><par n="Bejrút__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Bejrút"><i>Bejrút</i><par n="Bejrút__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Brad"><i>Brad</i><par n="Bejrút__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Buštěhrad"><i>Buštěhrad</i><par n="Bejrút__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Cleveland"><i>Cleveland</i><par n="Bejrút__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Dortmund"><i>Dortmund</i><par n="Bejrút__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Fryštát"><i>Fryštát</i><par n="Bejrút__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Jirkov"><i>Jirkov</i><par n="Bejrút__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Kynžvart"><i>Kynžvart</i><par n="Bejrút__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Letohrad"><i>Letohrad</i><par n="Bejrút__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Milán"><i>Milán</i><par n="Bejrút__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Perštýn"><i>Perštýn</i><par n="Bejrút__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Rajhrad"><i>Rajhrad</i><par n="Bejrút__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Štiřín"><i>Štiřín</i><par n="Bejrút__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Užhorod"><i>Užhorod</i><par n="Bejrút__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Volgograd"><i>Volgograd</i><par n="Bejrút__np"/></e>
    <e lm="chmýří"><i>chmýří</i><par n="hospodářství__n"/></e>
    <e lm="haraburdí"><i>haraburdí</i><par n="hospodářství__n"/></e>
    <e lm="knihovnictví"><i>knihovnictví</i><par n="hospodářství__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mezipřistání"><i>mezipřistání</i><par n="hospodářství__n"/></e>
    <e lm="návrší"><i>návrší</i><par n="hospodářství__n"/></e>
    <e lm="opilství"><i>opilství</i><par n="hospodářství__n"/></e>
    <e lm="podloubí"><i>podloubí</i><par n="hospodářství__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pořadí"><i>pořadí</i><par n="hospodářství__n"/></e>
    <e lm="příšeří"><i>příšeří</i><par n="hospodářství__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rukojmí"><i>rukojmí</i><par n="hospodářství__n"/></e>
    <e lm="souručenství"><i>souručenství</i><par n="hospodářství__n"/></e>
    <e lm="teplárenství"><i>teplárenství</i><par n="hospodářství__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zahraničí"><i>zahraničí</i><par n="hospodářství__n"/></e>
    <e lm="čistírna"><i>čistír</i><par n="mrd/na__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hvězdárna"><i>hvězdár</i><par n="mrd/na__n"/></e>
    <e lm="koksovna"><i>koksov</i><par n="mrd/na__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lékárna"><i>lékár</i><par n="mrd/na__n"/></e>
    <e lm="obrazárna"><i>obrazár</i><par n="mrd/na__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pojišťovna"><i>pojišťov</i><par n="mrd/na__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pryčna"><i>pryč</i><par n="mrd/na__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sněmovna"><i>sněmov</i><par n="mrd/na__n"/></e>
    <e lm="studovna" r="LR"><p><l>študov</l><r>studov</r></p><par n="mrd/na__n"/></e>
    <e lm="umývárna" r="LR"><p><l>umyvár</l><r>umývár</r></p><par n="mrd/na__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vozovna"><i>vozov</i><par n="mrd/na__n"/></e>
